Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1711
Preconstruction services, defined.

Preconstruction services means all nonconstruction-related services that a construction manager performs in relation to the design of the project before execution of a contract for construction services. Preconstruction services includes, but is not limited to, cost estimating, value engineering studies, constructability reviews, delivery schedule assessments, and life-cycle analysis.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 12.